Georgia, session 2025_26, HB355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to reincorporate the City of Doraville in the County of DeKalb, approved October 13,
1971 (Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 2154), as amended, is amended by revising Section 2.05 as
follows:
"Section 2.05.
Vacancy in the office of councilmember or mayor.
(a) Be it further enacted, that a vacancy shall exist if a councilmember or the mayor
resigns, dies, moves his or her residence from the city, or is absent from four consecutive
regular meetings of the governing authority, except if granted a leave of absence by the
H. B. 355
- 1 -

LC 61 0060/AP
council, which leave shall be entered upon the minute books; or if he or she is adjudged
incompetent or is convicted of malfeasance in office, or of a felony, or any violation of
election laws.
(b) If fewer than 12 months remain in the unexpired term of the vacated council seat, the
mayor shall appoint a successor to serve for the remainder of such term subject to the
approval of the majority of the remaining councilmembers. If more than 12 months remain
in the unexpired term of the vacated council seat, the vacated seat shall be filled for the
unexpired term at the next available special election date. Such special election shall be
called and held in the manner prescribed by Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the O.C.G.A., the
'Georgia Election Code,' as it now exists or may hereafter be amended.
(c) In the event a vacancy should occur in the office of the mayor, the vacancy shall be
filled at the next available special election date. Such special election shall be called and
held in the manner prescribed by Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the O.C.G.A., the 'Georgia
Election Code,' as it now exists or may hereafter be amended."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 355
- 2 -